en: pistachio paste
bg: паста от шамфъстъци
de: Pistazienpaste
fi: pistaasitahna
fr: pâte de pistache
hr: pasta od pistacija, pasta s pistacijama
it: pasta di pistacchio
pl: pasta z pistacji, pasta pistacjowa

en: pistachio flavor paste
hr: pasta okusa pistacije, krema od pistacija, krema od pistacija s komadićima pistacija
it: pasta al gusto di pistacchio

en: pistachio filling
hr: punjenje od pistacija
it: ripieno al pistacchio

en: walnut, walnuts, english walnut, english walnuts
af: Okkerneut
ar: جوز
bg: орех, орехи
bn: আখরোট
ca: nous
co: Noce
cs: vlašský ořech, vlašské ořechy
da: valnød, valnødder
de: Walnuss, Walnüsse
el: Καρύδι
eo: juglandonukso
es: nuez, nueces, nuez de castilla
et: Kreeka pähklid, Kreeka pähkleid
eu: Intxaur
fa: مغز گردو
fi: saksanpähkinä, saksanpähkinät
fr: noix
ga: Gallchnó, gallchnónna
hr: orasi
hu: dió
id: Kacang kenari
io: Nuco
it: noce, noci
ja: クルミ, くるみ
kn: ಅಖ್ರೋಟ್
ko: 호두
ky: Жаңгак
lb: Noss
lt: graikiniai riešutai
lv: Valrieksts, valrieksti
mr: अक्रोड
nl: walnoot, walnoten
nv: Haʼałtsédii
oc: Notz
or: ଅଖରୋଟ
pa: ਅਖਰੋਟ
pl: orzech włoski, orzechy włoskie
ps: غوز
pt: noz
ro: nucă
ru: грецкий орех
sd: اکروٽ
sk: vlašské orechy
sv: valnöt, valnötter
ta: வாதுமைக் கொட்டை
tr: ceviz
zh: 胡桃木, 核桃仁, 核桃

en: black walnut, black walnuts
xx: Juglans nigra

en: fresh walnut
fr: noix fraîche, noix sèche
it: noce fresca

en: walnut kernel, walnuts shelled, Nntural shelled walnuts
de: Walnusskerne, Walnusskern
es: nuez mondada, nueces peladas, nueces sin cáscara
fi: kuoreton saksanpähkinä, kuorettomat saksanpähkinät
fr: cerneaux de noix, Cerneaux de noix moitié nature
hr: orah jezgra, jezgra oraha
it: gherigli di noci, noci comuni
nb: Valnøttkjerner
nl: Gepelde walnoot, walnootpitten
pt: Miolo de noz

en: dried walnuts
de: getrocknete Walnüsse
es: nueces secas
fr: noix sèches
hr: sušeni orasi
it: noci secche

en: walnuts from Grenoble
es: nueces de Grenoble
fr: noix de Grenoble, noix sèches de Grenoble, noix de Grenoble sèche, noix sèche de Grenoble
hr: orasi iz grenoblea
it: noci di Grenoble

en: whole walnuts, dried whole walnuts
de: Walnüsse in der Schale
es: nueces cascara, nueces con cáscara
fr: noix en coques, noix en coques séchées
it: noci in guscio

fr: cerneaux de noix invalides
it: Nocciole pelate

en: seed, seeds, seed blend, seed mix, mixed seeds
af: Saad
ak: aba
an: Simient
ar: بذرة
ay: Jatha
az: Toxum
ba: Орлоҡ
be: Насенне
bg: Семе
bn: বীজ
bs: Sjemenka
ca: llavor
cs: semeno
cv: Курăк вăрри
da: frø
de: Kernen, Samen
el: Σπόρος
eo: semo
es: semilla, semillas, pipa, pipas, pepita, pepitas
et: Seeme, seemned
eu: Hazi
fa: بذر
fi: siemen, siemenet
fr: graine, graines, mélange de graines
ga: Síol
gl: Semente
he: זרע
hi: बीज
hr: sjeme, sjemena
ht: Grenn
hu: Mag
hy: Գրենաժ
ia: grana
id: biji
io: Semino
is: Fræ
it: seme, semi
ja: 種子
jv: Wiji
kk: Тұқым
ko: 씨
ku: tov
ky: Урук
la: Semen
lb: Som
ln: Mombóto
lv: sēkla
mk: семе
ml: വിത്ത്
mr: बी
my: Biji benih
nb: frø
ne: बीउ
nl: zaad, zaden
nn: frø
oc: Grana
pa: ਬੀਜ
pl: nasiono, nasiona, pestki, ziarna, pestek, nasion, ziaren, ziarno
pt: semente, sementes
qu: Muru
ro: Sămânță
ru: семя
sa: धान्यानि
sd: ٻج
sh: Sjeme
sk: Semeno
sl: Seme
sn: Mbeu
so: Iniin
sr: семе
su: Siki
sv: frö
sw: Mbegu
ta: வித்து
te: విత్తనము
tg: Buto
tr: Tohum
ug: ئۇرۇق
uk: Насіння
ur: بیج
vi: Hạt
wa: Grinne
za: Ceh
zh: 種子

en: oilseed, oilseeds
bg: маслодайни семена
de: Ölsamen
it: semi oleosi

en: alfalfa seeds
ca: llavor d'alfals
fr: Graines de Luzerne
hr: sjeme lucerne
it: semi di erba medica
nl: alfalfa zaad

en: raw alfalfa seeds
fr: Graines de Luzerne cru
it: semi di erba medica cruda

en: sprouted alfalfa seeds, germinated alfalfa
fr: Graines de Luzerne germées
hr: proklijalo sjeme lucerne
it: semi di erba medica germogliati
ja: 糸もやし, アルファルファもやし
pl: kiełki lucerny

en: raw sprouted alfalfa seeds
it: semi di erba medica germogliati crudi

en: aniseed, anise
cs: anýz
da: anis, anisfrø
de: Anissamen, anis
es: semilla de anís, anis, matalahúga
fi: anis
fr: anis, graine d'anis vert, anis vert, graine d'anis
hr: anis, plod anisa
it: Anice
nl: anijszaad, anijs
pl: anyż, anyżek, anyżu, anyż owoc, anyz owoc
ru: семена аниса
sv: anis, anisfrö
te: సోపు
tt: әнис орлыгы

en: organic aniseed, organic anise
es: anis bio
fi: luomuanis, luomu anis
fr: anis bio
hr: organski anis
it: anice bio
nl: biologisch anijszaad, anijs bio

en: coriander seed
ca: llavor de coriandre
cs: semeno koriandro
da: korianderfrø
de: Koriandersamen
el: σπέρμα κορίανδρου
eo: koriandra frukto
es: Semillas de cilantro
fi: korianterinsiemen
fr: graine de coriandre, graines de coriandre
gu: ધાણા
he: זרעי כוסברה
hr: sjeme korijandera
hy: Եփութուխ:Համեմ
it: Semi di coriandolo
nb: korianderfrö
nl: korianderzaad
or: ଧନିଆ ମଞ୍ଜି
pl: owoc kolendry, owoc kolendry siewnej, nasiona kolendry, nasiono kolendry, ziarna kolendry
pt: semente de coentro
ru: семена кориандра
sv: korianderfrö
th: ม็ดผักชี